Wyoming, session 2025, SF0064.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-18-121 is created to read:
11-18-121. Identification of livestock; livestock
board responsibilities.
(a) The Wyoming livestock board shall inform
livestock producers of all available options under W.S.
11-18-117 for identification regarding disease
traceability.
(b) The buyers of livestock in receiving states shall
be responsible for tagging livestock if an electronic
identification device requirement is mandated in the
receiving state, unless the Wyoming livestock owner has
voluntarily utilized electronic identification devices.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a Wyoming
licensed and accredited veterinarian from writing a
certificate of veterinary inspection in compliance with
applicable destination requirements.
Section 2.
(a) The legislature finds that:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Wyoming and the nation's voluntary livestock
identification system has served the livestock industry
well for decades;
(ii) The United States department of
agriculture's animal and plant health inspection service
announced a final rule in April of 2024 that would require
certain livestock to wear electronically readable devices
in order to prevent and manage livestock disease outbreaks;
(iii) If the United States department of
agriculture and the animal and plant health inspection
service were concerned with and focused on preventing a
livestock disease outbreak, they would stop the importation
of livestock from countries that have known and documented
problems with disease, yet they do not do so;
(iv) The vast majority of livestock affected by
this mandatory electronic identification rule originate
from wide open spaces and live on clean, disease-free
pastures and not in confined areas with thousands of
livestock coming from different areas;
(v) The United States department of agriculture
and the animal and plant health inspection service have
stated that a seventy percent (70%) compliance rate with
mandatory electronic identification usage would be
necessary to make the identification program an effective
disease traceability requirement;
(vi) Wyoming already has livestock
identification methods that are far superior to the
mandatory electronic identification rules that, according
to the United States department of agriculture and the
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
animal and plant health inspection service, are
specifically targeted to apply to only eleven percent (11%)
of all livestock in the country; and
(vii) The mandatory electronic identification
rule was put in place by a federal government agency rather
than being voted on by the United States congress, making
it only a rule and not codified law.
(b) It is the policy of the state of Wyoming that:
(i) Wyoming is opposed to the animal and plant
health inspection service's rule mandating electronic
identification devices for Wyoming livestock;
(ii) W.S. 11-18-117 clearly defines the terms by
which the Wyoming livestock industry can continue to do
business and have the freedom, right and liberty to use
historically reliable, affordable, confidential and
voluntary methods of livestock identification, including
brands, backtags, tattoos and ear tags;
(iii) Wyoming will seek to work with existing
metal identification tag manufacturers to produce those
tags historically used to confirm livestock health and
identity;
(iv) Wyoming is committed to working with other
states to develop agreements and arrangements to allow
livestock to be transported to and from Wyoming without
being required to use electronic identification ear tags;
(v) Wyoming shall demand that the United States
department of agriculture and the animal and plant health
inspection service provide a complete and full accounting
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and accurate estimate of all costs associated with
mandating that Wyoming's livestock producers use electronic
identification ear tags, including costs associated with
hardware, software, ear tags, wands, retrofitting of
livestock handling facilities, retrofitting of sales barns,
working of livestock and costs related to additional
paperwork, digital input and filings necessary to prove
compliance with the electronic identification ear tag rule
to the Wyoming legislature.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5